Odia_apertium_morph_dict.dix
<pardef n="S/o__v">
<e><p><l>ue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ou</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ou</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ua</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ua</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uanwi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uanwi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uanwi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouCi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouCu</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouCu</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouCa</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouCa</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouCanwi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouCi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouCanwi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouCanwi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiCi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiCu</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiCu</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiCa</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiCa</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiCanwi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiCi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiCanwi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiCanwi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oili</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oilu</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oilu</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oila</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oila</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oile</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oilA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oile</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oile</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWili</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWilu</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWilu</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWila</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWila</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWile</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWilA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWile</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWile</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiWili</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiWilu</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiWilu</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiWila</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiWila</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiWile</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiWilA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiWile</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiWile</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:iWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oibi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oibu</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oibu</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiba</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiba</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oibe</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiba</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oibe</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oibe</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:ba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWibi</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWibu</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWibu</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWiba</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWiba</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWibe</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWiba</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWibe</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ouWibe</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:uWiba"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="So"><i>S</i><par n="S/o__v"/></e>
<e lm="Wo"><i>W</i><par n="S/o__v"/></e>
<e lm="Xo"><i>X</i><par n="S/o__v"/></e>
